Arkansas, session 2025, HB1044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-114-103(c), concerning general
provisions under the Charitable Bingo and Raffles Enabling Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(c)(1) The provisions of this chapter are not intended and shall not
be construed to allow the play of games of bingo or raffles through any
electronic device or machine.
(2) This chapter shall not regulate, limit, or prohibit an
institution of higher education or its affiliated nonprofit organization from
conducting raffles for charitable, philanthropic, or educational purposes in
accordance with the Arkansas Sports Raffle Act, § 23-120-101 et seq.

*CRH014*
01-30-2025 10:07:53 CRH014

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 HB1044
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23 is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:

CHAPTER 120
ARKANSAS SPORTS RAFFLE ACT

23-120-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Sports
Raffle Act".

23-120-102. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) It is in the public interest for an institution of higher
education and its affiliated nonprofit organizations to conduct raffles for
educational, charitable, or philanthropic purposes; and
(2) The use of raffle funds by an institution of higher
education and its affiliated nonprofit organizations for the purposes
provided in this chapter will support philanthropic purposes by:
(A) Raising the public image of the institution of higher
education, which will attract more student-athletes and other students to the
institution of higher education's educational programs;
(B) Supporting student-athletes and providing financial
resources to advance the educational endeavors of the student-athletes; and
(C) Increasing the exposure of the institution of higher
education to the public, which will attract additional financial support for
academic programs at the institution of higher education.

23-120-103. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Affiliated nonprofit organization” means an organization
established by or an authorized affiliate of an institution of higher
education within the State of Arkansas that:
(A) Was created for the purpose of raising funds for the
institution of higher education’s collegiate athletic program;
(B) Has been approved for tax-exempt status under the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), as in effect on January 1,
01-30-2025 10:07:53 CRH014

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 HB1044
2025; and
(C) Has been in continuing existence as a nonprofit tax-
exempt organization in the State of Arkansas at least five (5) years
immediately prior to conducting a raffle;
(2) “Qualifying organization” means an institution of higher
education within the State of Arkansas or an affiliated nonprofit
organization; and
(3) “Raffle” means the selling of tickets or chances to win a
prize awarded through a random drawing.

23-120-104. Conducting raffles.
(a) A qualifying organization is authorized to conduct a raffle under
this chapter.
(b) A raffle conducted by a qualifying organization under this
chapter:
(1) May be conducted on:
(A) A digital or electronic device;
(B) An online platform, website, or software application;
or
(C) Any premises owned, leased, or otherwise utilized by a
qualifying organization; and
(2) Shall be:
(A) Based on an official game or sporting event between a
qualifying organization's collegiate athletic team and an opposing
institution of higher education's collegiate athletic team; and
(B) Limited to one (1) raffle per official game or
sporting event.
(c) A qualifying organization conducting a raffle under this chapter:
(1) May determine what method of payment the qualifying
organization will accept in exchange for a raffle ticket;
(2) Shall designate the prize amount or division of receipts of
a raffle; and
(3) Shall publicly announce the prize amount or division of
receipts of a raffle prior to the sale of the raffle ticket.
(d) A qualifying organization may utilize receipts from the raffle for
the following purposes:
01-30-2025 10:07:53 CRH014

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 HB1044
(1) Payment of prizes designated for the raffle;
(2) Payment of administrative costs, fees, or expenses to
operate, conduct, advertise, and promote the raffle under this section;
(3) Purchase of software, technology, supplies, or equipment to
operate, conduct, advertise, and promote the raffle under this section;
(4) Provision of scholarships, financial aid, stipends, or other
compensation to a student-athlete attending the institution of higher
education;
(5) Compensation of a student-athlete for the commercial use of
his or her publicity rights in accordance with the Arkansas Student-Athlete
Publicity Rights Act, § 4-75-1301 et seq.;
(6) General support of the institution of higher education’s
athletics teams or programs; and
(7) Purchase, maintenance, repair, debt service, or construction
of the institution of higher education’s collegiate athletic property,
facilities, or equipment.
(e) If a qualifying organization elects to allow credit cards as a
method of payment under subsection (c) of this section, there shall be a cap
of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per transaction.

23-120-105. Limitation on use of funds.
Receipts from a raffle shall not be used to compensate a person who
works for or is affiliated with the qualifying organization that conducts the
raffle.

23-120-106. Unclaimed raffle prizes.
A raffle prize that is unclaimed by a winner within one hundred twenty
(120) days of the raffle shall be retained by the institution of higher
education for which the raffle was conducted.

23-120-107. Restrictions.
(a) A person under eighteen (18) years of age shall not purchase a
raffle ticket.
(b) A casino licensee or an agent of a casino licensee shall not act
as a third-party operator or otherwise administer a raffle on behalf of the
qualifying organization.
01-30-2025 10:07:53 CRH014

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 HB1044

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 3-4-403(19)(B), concerning the exception
from the Class A permit violation for conducting or permitting gambling on
premises with an alcoholic beverage permit, is amended to read as follows:
(B) Conducting or permitting gambling under subdivision
(19)(A) of this section does not include:
(i) Charitable bingo and raffles under the
Charitable Bingo and Raffles Enabling Act, § 23-114-101 et seq.; or
(ii) A lottery under the Arkansas Scholarship
Lottery Act, § 23-115-101 et seq.; or
(iii) A raffle conducted under the Arkansas Sports
Raffle Act, § 23-120-101 et seq.;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 3-5-221(d)(1)(A)(ii), concerning exceptions
to the crime of gambling on the premises of a holder of a beer and light wine
license, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) Forms of gambling under subdivision
(d)(1)(A)(i) of this section do not include:
(a) Charitable bingo and raffles under the
Charitable Bingo and Raffles Enabling Act, § 23-114-101 et seq.; or
(b) A lottery under the Arkansas Scholarship
Lottery Act, § 23-115-101 et seq.; or
(c) A raffle conducted under the Arkansas
Sports Raffle Act, § 23-120-101 et seq.;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 3-5-307(5)(B), concerning exceptions to
prohibited practices related to gambling on the premises of a holder of a
beer retailer license, is amended to read as follows:
(B) Permitting gambling or games of chance under
subdivision (5)(A) of this section does not include:
(i) Charitable bingo and raffles under the
Charitable Bingo and Raffles Enabling Act, § 23-114-101 et seq.; or
(ii) A lottery under the Arkansas Scholarship
Lottery Act, § 23-115-101 et seq.; or
(iii) A raffle conducted under the Arkansas Sports
Raffle Act, § 23-120-101 et seq.;
01-30-2025 10:07:53 CRH014

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 HB1044

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 3-9-236(15)(C), concerning exceptions to
the crime of allowing gambling on the premises of a holder of a permit for
on-premises consumption of alcohol, is amended to read as follows:
(C) A gambling or a gaming device, machine, or apparatus
under subdivision (15)(A) of this section does not include:
(i) Charitable bingo and raffles under the
Charitable Bingo and Raffles Enabling Act, § 23-114-101 et seq.; or
(ii) A lottery under the Arkansas Scholarship
Lottery Act, § 23-115-101 et seq.; or
(iii) A raffle conducted under the Arkansas Sports
Raffle Act, § 23-120-101 et seq.;

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that institutions of higher
education and their affiliated nonprofit organizations are intertwined with
economic development, the education of student-athletes, commerce, and other
governmental interests that otherwise impact the State of Arkansas; that the
current prohibitions on institutions of higher education and their affiliated
nonprofit organizations from conducting raffles for educational, charitable,
or philanthropic purposes hinder institutions of higher education and their
student-athletes, which thereby hinder economic development, education, and
commerce in the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary
to ensure that institutions of higher education and their affiliated
nonprofit organizations can financially support their student-athletes and
athletic programs, which will bolster economic development, education, and
commerce in the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the
public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

01-30-2025 10:07:53 CRH014

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 HB1044
/s/Hawk



































01-30-2025 10:07:53 CRH014